test/src/morphology/verb-paras_gt-norm.yaml
Tests:
  V: #
    kutoa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kutoo # knit
    kutoa+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pe4: kudotaan # 
    tietää+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tietää # know
    tietää+V+Act+Ind+Pst+Sg2: tiesit # 
    nähdä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: nähnyt # 
    juosta+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: juossut # 
  V_KAUNISTUA: #
    kaunistua+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: kaunistua # beautify
    kaunistua+V+Act+InfE+Sg+Ine: kaunistuessa # 
    kaunistua+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kaunistun # 
    kaunistua+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kaunistuu # 
    kaunistua+V+Act+Ind+Pst+Sg1: kaunistuin # 
    kaunistua+V+Act+Ind+Pst+Sg3: kaunistui # 
    kaunistua+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: kaunistuisi # 
    kaunistua+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: kaunistukaa # 
    kaunistua+V+Act+Pot+Sg1: kaunistunen # 
    kaunistua+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pe4: kaunistutaan # 
    kaunistua+V+Pss+Ind+Pst+Pe4: kaunistuttiin # 
    kaunistua+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: kaunistuttu # 
    kaunistua+V+Der/minen+Sg+Nom: kaunistuminen # 
  V_PUNOA: #
    punoa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: punoa # bundle?
    punoa+V+Act+InfE+Sg+Ine: punoessa # 
    punoa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: punon # 
    punoa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: punoo # 
    punoa+V+Act+Ind+Pst+Sg1: punoin # 
    punoa+V+Act+Ind+Pst+Sg3: punoi # 
    punoa+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: punoisi # 
    punoa+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: punokaa # 
    punoa+V+Act+Pot+Sg1: punonen # 
    punoa+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pe4: punotaan # 
    punoa+V+Pss+Ind+Pst+Pe4: punottiin # 
    punoa+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: punottu # 
    punoa+V+Der/minen+Sg+Nom: punominen # 
  V_SÄILÖÄ: #
    säilöä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: säilöä # store
    säilöä+V+Act+InfE+Sg+Ine: säilöessä # 
    säilöä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: säilön # 
    säilöä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: säilöö # 
    säilöä+V+Act+Ind+Pst+Sg1: säilöin # 
    säilöä+V+Act+Ind+Pst+Sg3: säilöi # 
    säilöä+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: säilöisi # 
    säilöä+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: säilökää # 
    säilöä+V+Act+Pot+Sg1: säilönen # 
    säilöä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pe4: säilötään # 
    säilöä+V+Pss+Ind+Pst+Pe4: säilöttiin # 
    säilöä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: säilötty # 
    säilöä+V+Der/minen+Sg+Nom: säilöminen # 
  V_ÄLLISTYÄ: #
    ällistyä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: ällistyä # amaze
    ällistyä+V+Act+InfE+Sg+Ine: ällistyessä # 
    ällistyä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ällistyn # 
    ällistyä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ällistyy # 
    ällistyä+V+Act+Ind+Pst+Sg1: ällistyin # 
    ällistyä+V+Act+Ind+Pst+Sg3: ällistyi # 
    ällistyä+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: ällistyisi # 
    ällistyä+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: ällistykää # 
    ällistyä+V+Act+Pot+Sg1: ällistynen # 
    ällistyä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pe4: ällistytään # 
    ällistyä+V+Pss+Ind+Pst+Pe4: ällistyttiin # 
    ällistyä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: ällistytty # 
  V_HAUKKOA: #
    haukkoa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: haukkoa # gasp
  V_NUOKKUA: #
    nuokkua+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: nuokkua # sleep
  V_KÄRKKYÄ: #
    kärkkyä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: kärkkyä # steal
  V_HARPPOA: #
    harppoa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: harppoa # walk
  V_LOPPUA: #
    loppua+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: loppua # end
  V_LEPPYÄ: #
    leppyä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: leppyä # settle
  V_KIVETTYÄ: #
    kivettyä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: kivettyä # stone
  V_VIITTOA: #
    viittoa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: viittoa # sign
  V_HERMOTTUA: #
    hermottua+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: hermottua # nerve
  V_MÄIKYÄ: #
    mäikyä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: mäikyä # bong
  V_TAKOA: #
    takoa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: takoa # hammer
  V_MAUKUA: #
    maukua+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: maukua # gong
  V_ELPYÄ: #
    elpyä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: elpyä # rescuscitate
  V_HIIPUA: #
    hiipua+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: hiipua # fizzle
  V_SILPOA: #
    silpoa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: silpoa # slash
  V_KIETOA: #
    kietoa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: kietoa # entangle
  V_SILIYTYÄ: #
    siliytyä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: siliytyä # iron
  V_ROHTUA: #
    rohtua+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: rohtua # scar
  V_VINKUA: #
    vinkua+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: vinkua # squeal
  V_PENKOA: #
    penkoa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: penkoa # dig
  V_TEMPOA: #
    tempoa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: tempoa # tuck
  V_AMPUA: #
    ampua+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: ampua # shoot
  V_MIELTYÄ: #
    mieltyä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: mieltyä # like
  V_HUMALTUA: #
    humaltua+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: humaltua # intoxicate
  V_VAKAANTUA: #
    vakaantua+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: vakaantua # stabilise
  V_TYHJENTYÄ: #
    tyhjentyä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: tyhjentyä # empty
  V_PYÖRTYÄ: #
    pyörtyä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: pyörtyä # faint
  V_VARTOA: #
    vartoa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: vartoa # wait
  V_PUSERTUA: #
    pusertua+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: pusertua # squeeze
  V_MUTRISTAA: #
    mutristaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: mutristaa # ?
  V_KIVISTÄÄ: #
    kivistää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: kivistää # hurt
  V_RÄPSYTTÄÄ: #
    räpsyttää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: räpsyttää # blink
  V_VIEROITTAA: #
    vieroittaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: vieroittaa # 
  V_PURKAA: #
    purkaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: purkaa # tear
  V_YSKÄHTÄÄ: #
    kärähtää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: kärähtää # fry
  V_MOJAHTAA: #
    mojahtaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: mojahtaa # smack
  V_KYNTÄÄ: #
    kyntää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: kyntää # plow
  V_SORTAA: #
    sortaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: sortaa # crush
  V_HUUTAA: #
    huutaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: huutaa # yell
  V_PYYTÄÄ: #
    pyytää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: pyytää # aks
  V_SIVALTAA: #
    sivaltaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: sivaltaa # slash
  V_VIHELTÄÄ: #
    viheltää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: viheltää # whistle
  V_HIVENTÄÄ: #
    hiventää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: hiventää # 
  V_HUONONTAA: #
    huonontaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: huonontaa # worsen
  V_KUHERTAA: #
    kuhertaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: kuhertaa # snuggle
  V_NÄPERTÄÄ: #
    näpertää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: näpertää # twiddle
  V_KIITÄÄ: #
    kiitää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: kiitää # rush
  V_JOUTAA: #
    joutaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: joutaa # 
  V_YLTÄÄ: #
    yltää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: yltää # reach
  V_ENTÄÄ: #
    entää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: entää # 
  V_KASVAA: #
    kasvaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: kasvaa # grow
  V_VIRKKAA: #
    jakaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: jakaa # share
  V_TAPPAA: #
    tappaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: tappaa # kill
  V_AUTTAA: #
    auttaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: auttaa # help
  V_SATAA: #
    sataa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: sataa # rain
  V_KANTAA: #
    kantaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: kantaa # carry
  V_KAATAA: #
    kaataa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: kaataa # pour
  V_SAARTAA: #
    saartaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: saartaa # surround
  V_KYTKEÄ: #
    kytkeä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: kytkeä # switch
  V_SOTKEA: #
    sotkea+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: sotkea # mess
  V_PUKEA: #
    pukea+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: pukea # dress
  V_RYPEÄ: #
    rypeä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: rypeä # bathe
  V_PÄTEÄ: #
    päteä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: päteä # nitpick
  V_KUTEA: #
    kutea+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: kutea # breed
  V_TUNKEA: #
    tunkea+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: tunkea # push
  V_POLKEA: #
    polkea+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: polkea # stomp
  V_SÄRKEÄ: #
    särkeä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: särkeä # break
  V_TUNTEA: #
    tuntea+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: tuntea # feel
  V_LÄHTEÄ: #
    lähteä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: lähteä # go
  V_KOSIA: #
    kosia+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: kosia # propose
  V_RYSKIÄ: #
    ryskiä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: ryskiä # crash
  V_KUKKIA: #
    kukkia+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: kukkia # bloom
  V_SÖRKKIÄ: #
    sörkkiä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: sörkkiä # meddle
  V_KALPPIA: #
    kalppia+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: kalppia # 
  V_HYPPIÄ: #
    hyppiä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: hyppiä # jump
  V_MOITTIA: #
    moittia+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: moittia # 
  V_MIETTIÄ: #
    miettiä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: miettiä # ponder
  V_RIIPIÄ: #
    riipiä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: riipiä # pull
  V_RAAPIA: #
    raapia+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: raapia # scratch
  V_AHNEHTIA: #
    ahnehtia+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: ahnehtia # greed
  V_EHTIÄ: #
    ehtiä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: ehtiä # 
  V_MÖNKIÄ: #
    mönkiä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: mönkiä # crawl
  V_ONKIA: #
    onkia+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: onkia # fish
  V_TYMPIÄ: #
    tympiä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: tympiä # bore
  V_KONTIA: #
    kontia+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: kontia # 
  V_HYLKIÄ: #
    hylkiä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: hylkiä # reject
  V_KOPIOIDA: #
    kopioida+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: kopioida # copy
  V_ÖYKKÄRÖIDÄ: #
    öykkäröidä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: öykkäröidä # bully
  V_SAADA: #
    saada+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: saada # get
  V_MYYDÄ: #
    myydä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: myydä # sell
  V_JÄÄDÄ: #
    jäädä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: jäädä # stay
  V_VIEDÄ: #
    viedä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: viedä # take
  V_TUODA: #
    tuoda+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: tuoda # bring
  V_SYÖDÄ: #
    syödä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: syödä # eat
  V_KÄYDÄ: #
    käydä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: käydä # visit
  V_MARISTA: #
    marista+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: marista # whine
  V_ÄRISTÄ: #
    äristä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: äristä # arr
  V_HÄVÄISTÄ: #
    häväistä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: häväistä # sacrilege
  V_VAVISTA: #
    vavista+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: vavista # shake
  V_RANGAISTA: #
    rangaista+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: rangaista # punish
  V_PIERRÄ: #
    pierrä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: pierrä # fart
  V_MENNÄ: #
    mennä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: mennä # go
  V_VASTAILLA: #
    vastailla+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: vastailla # answer
  V_ÄKSYILLÄ: #
    äksyillä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: äksyillä # 
  V_LEIKELLÄ: #
    leikellä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: leikellä # cut
  V_NAKELLA: #
    nakella+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: nakella # throw
  V_TAPELLA: #
    tapella+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: tapella # fight
  V_HYPELLÄ: #
    hypellä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: hypellä # jump
  V_SULATELLA: #
    sulatella+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: sulatella # melt
  V_HERÄTELLÄ: #
    herätellä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: herätellä # wake
  V_TIPAHDELLA: #
    tipahdella+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: tipahdella # drop
  V_SÄPSÄHDELLÄ: #
    säpsähdellä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: säpsähdellä # wake
  V_OMMELLA: #
    ommella+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: ommella # sow
  V_VAELLELLA: #
    vaellella+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: vaellella # wander
  V_KIILLELLÄ: #
    kiillellä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: kiillellä # sparkle
  V_KOMENNELLA: #
    komennella+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: komennella # boss
  V_KÄÄNNELLÄ: #
    käännellä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: käännellä # turn
  V_NAKERRELLA: #
    nakerrella+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: nakerrella # bite
  V_KIHERRELLÄ: #
    kiherrellä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: kiherrellä # giggle
  V_ISÄNNÖIDÄ: #
    isännöidä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: isännöidä # host
  V_MELLAKOIDA: #
    mellakoida+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: mellakoida # riot
  V_PALKITA: #
    palkita+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: palkita # reward
  V_MERKITÄ: #
    merkitä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: merkitä # mark
  V_JUOSTA: #
    juosta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: juosta # run
  V_PIESTÄ: #
    piestä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: piestä # spank
  V_NÄHDÄ: #
    nähdä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: nähdä # see
  V_KARHETA: #
    karheta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: karheta # 
  V_VÄHETÄ: #
    vähetä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: vähetä # lessen
  V_NIUKETA: #
    niuketa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: niuketa # tighten
  V_JYRKETÄ: #
    jyrketä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: jyrketä # 
  V_HAPATA: #
    hapata+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: hapata # ensour
  V_SUPETA: #
    supeta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: supeta # tighten
  V_TYLPETÄ: #
    tylpetä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: tylpetä # dull
  V_HELPOTA: #
    helpota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: helpota # ease
  V_LOITOTA: #
    loitota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: loitota # distance
  V_ULOTA: #
    ulota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: ulota # outen
  V_KAVETA: #
    kaveta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: kaveta # tighten
  V_MÄDÄTÄ: #
    mädätä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: mädätä # rot
  V_LEUDOTA: #
    leudota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: leudota # 
  V_TODETA: #
    todeta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: todeta # note
  V_PIDETÄ: #
    pidetä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: pidetä # lengthen
  V_LÄMMETÄ: #
    lämmetä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: lämmetä # warm
  V_KIINNETÄ: #
    kiinnetä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: kiinnetä # firm
  V_JULJETA: #
    juljeta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: juljeta # dare
  V_ARVATA: #
    arvata+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: arvata # guess
  V_YNNÄTÄ: #
    ynnätä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: ynnätä # add
  V_MORKATA: #
    morkata+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: morkata # blame
  V_YÖKÄTÄ: #
    yökätä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: yökätä # yuck
  V_SIEPATA: #
    siepata+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: siepata # kidnap
  V_VÄLPÄTÄ: #
    välpätä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: välpätä # 
  V_LUNTATA: #
    luntata+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: luntata # cheat
  V_LÄNTÄTÄ: #
    läntätä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: läntätä # splat
  V_KAIVATA: #
    kaivata+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: kaivata # long
  V_LEVÄTÄ: #
    levätä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: levätä # rest
  V_JAHDATA: #
    jahdata+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: jahdata # hunt
